Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
In General

§ 31-11-1.
Bureau of building, grounds, and real property management; definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the term “state building commission” shall mean the Governor’s office of general services acting through the bureau of building, grounds and real property management.

Wherever the term “state building commission” or “building commission” appears in the laws of the State of Mississippi, it shall be construed to mean the Governor’s office of general services.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9023-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 31-11-3.
Powers and duties.

The Department of Finance and Administration, for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, in addition to all other rights and powers granted by law, shall have full power and authority to employ and compensate architects or other employees necessary for the purpose of making inspections, preparing plans and specifications, supervising the erection of any buildings, and making any repairs or additions as may be determined by the Department of Finance and Administration to be necessary, pursuant to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board. The department shall have entire control and supervision of, and determine what, if any, buildings, additions, repairs, demolitions or improvements are to be made under the provisions of this chapter, subject to the regulations adopted by the Public Procurement Review Board.

The department shall have full power to erect buildings, make repairs, additions or improvements, demolitions, to grant or acquire easements or rights-of-way, and to buy materials, supplies and equipment for any of the institutions or departments of the state subject to the regulations adopted by the Public Procurement Review Board. In addition to other powers conferred, the department shall have full power and authority, as directed by the Legislature, or when funds have been appropriated for its use for these purposes, to:

Build a state office building;

Build suitable plants or buildings for the use and housing of any state schools or institutions, including the building of plants or buildings for new state schools or institutions, as provided for by the Legislature;

Provide state aid for the construction of school buildings;

Promote and develop the training of returned veterans of the United States in all sorts of educational and vocational learning to be supplied by the proper educational institution of the State of Mississippi, and in so doing allocate monies appropriated to it for these purposes to the Governor for use by him in setting up, maintaining and operating an office and employing a state director of on-the-job training for veterans and the personnel necessary in carrying out Public Law No. 346 of the United States;

Build and equip a hospital and administration building at the Mississippi State Penitentiary;

Build and equip additional buildings and wards at the Boswell Retardation Center;

Construct a sewage disposal and treatment plant at the Mississippi State Hospital, and in so doing acquire additional land as may be necessary, and to exercise the right of eminent domain in the acquisition of this land;

Build and equip the Mississippi central market and purchase or acquire by eminent domain, if necessary, any lands needed for this purpose;

Build and equip suitable facilities for a training and employing center for the blind;

Build and equip a gymnasium at Columbia Training School;

Approve or disapprove the expenditure of any money appropriated by the Legislature when authorized by the bill making the appropriation;

Expend monies appropriated to it in paying the state’s part of the cost of any street paving;

Sell and convey state lands when authorized by the Legislature, cause said lands to be properly surveyed and platted, execute all deeds or other legal instruments, and do any and all other things required to effectively carry out the purpose and intent of the Legislature. Any transaction which involves state lands under the provisions of this paragraph shall be done in a manner consistent with the provisions of Section 29-1-1;

Collect and receive from educational institutions of the State of Mississippi monies required to be paid by these institutions to the state in carrying out any veterans’ educational programs;

Purchase lands for building sites, or as additions to building sites, for the erection of buildings and other facilities which the department is authorized to erect, and demolish and dispose of old buildings, when necessary for the proper construction of new buildings. Any transaction which involves state lands under the provisions of this paragraph shall be done in a manner consistent with the provisions of Section 29-1-1;

Obtain business property insurance with a deductible of not less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) on state-owned buildings under the management and control of the department; and

In consultation with and approval by the Chairmen of the Public Property Committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives, enter into contracts for the purpose of providing parking spaces for state employees who work in the Woolfolk Building, the Carroll Gartin Justice Building or the Walter Sillers Office Building.

The department shall survey state-owned and state-utilized buildings to establish an estimate of the costs of architectural alterations, pursuant to the Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 USCS, Section 12111 et seq. The department shall establish priorities for making the identified architectural alterations and shall make known to the Legislative Budget Office and to the Legislature the required cost to effectuate such alterations. To meet the requirements of this section, the department shall use standards of accessibility that are at least as stringent as any applicable federal requirements and may consider:

Federal minimum guidelines and requirements issued by the United States Architectural and Transportation Barriers Compliance Board and standards issued by other federal agencies;

The criteria contained in the American Standard Specifications for Making Buildings Accessible and Usable by the Physically Handicapped and any amendments thereto as approved by the American Standards Association, Incorporated (ANSI Standards);

Design manuals;

Applicable federal guidelines;

Current literature in the field;

Applicable safety standards; and

Any applicable environmental impact statements.

The department shall observe the provisions of Section 31-5-23 in letting contracts and shall use Mississippi products, including paint, varnish and lacquer which contain as vehicles tung oil and either ester gum or modified resin (with rosin as the principal base of constituents), and turpentine shall be used as a solvent or thinner, where these products are available at a cost not to exceed the cost of products grown, produced, prepared, made or manufactured outside of the State of Mississippi.

The department shall have authority to accept grants, loans or donations from the United States government or from any other sources for the purpose of matching funds in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

The department shall build a wheelchair ramp at the War Memorial Building which complies with all applicable federal laws, regulations and specifications regarding wheelchair ramps.

The department shall review and preapprove all architectural or engineering service contracts entered into by any state agency, institution, commission, board or authority, regardless of the source of funding used to defray the costs of the construction or renovation project, for which services are to be obtained to ensure compliance with purchasing regulations and to confirm that the contracts are procured by a competitive qualification-based selection process except where such appointment is for an emergency project or for a continuation of a previous appointment for a directly related project. The provisions of this subsection (7) shall not apply to:

Any architectural or engineering contract fully paid for by self-generated funds of any of the state institutions of higher learning;

Any architectural or engineering contract that is self-administered at a state institution of higher learning as provided under Section 27-104-7(2)(b) or 37-101-15(m);

Community college projects that are fully funded from local funds or other nonstate sources which are outside the Department of Finance and Administration’s appropriations or as directed by the Legislature;

Any construction or design projects of the State Military Department that are fully or partially funded from federal funds or other nonstate sources; and

Any project of the State Department of Transportation.

The department shall have the authority to obtain annually from the state institutions of higher learning, the state community colleges and junior colleges, the Department of Mental Health, the Department of Corrections and the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks information on all renovation and repair expenditures for buildings under their operation and control, including duties, responsibilities and costs of any architect or engineer hired by any such institutions, and shall annually report the same to the Legislative Budget Office, the Chairman of the House Public Property Committee and the Chairman of the Senate Public Property Committee before September 1.

All state agencies, departments and institutions are required to cooperate with the Department of Finance and Administration in carrying out the provisions of this subsection.

Expenditures shall not include those amounts expended for janitorial, landscaping or administrative support, but shall include expenditures from both state and nonstate sources.

Expenditures shall not include amounts expended by the department on behalf of state agencies, departments and institutions through the Department of Finance and Administration administered contracts, but shall include amounts transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration for support of such contracts.

As an alternative to other methods of awarding contracts as prescribed by law, the department may elect to use the method of contracting for construction projects set out in Sections 31-7-13.1 and 31-7-13.2; however, the dual-phase design-build method of construction contracting authorized under Section 31-7-13.1 may be used only when the Legislature has specifically required or authorized the use of this method in the legislation authorizing a project.

The department shall have the authority, for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, and in addition to all other rights and powers granted by law, to create and maintain a list of suspended and debarred contractors and subcontractors. Consistent with this authority, the department may adopt regulations governing the suspension or debarment of contractors and subcontractors, which regulations shall be subject to the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board. A suspended or debarred contractor or subcontractor shall be disqualified from consideration for contracts with the department during the suspension or debarment period in accordance with the department’s regulations.

This section shall not apply to the Mississippi State Port Authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9023-02; Laws, 1944, ch. 328, §§ 2-4; Laws, 1946, ch. 386, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 392, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 30; Laws, 1991, ch. 411, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 615, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 448, § 1; Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 24; Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 189; Laws, 2005, ch. 504, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 457, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 579, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 494, § 8; Laws, 2008, ch. 488, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 314, § 3; Laws, 2011, ch. 485, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 485, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 533, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 399, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 351, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 465, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 31-11-4.
Facilities Management Advisory Committee.

There is hereby created the Facilities Management Advisory Committee, hereinafter referred to as the “committee,” for the purpose of advising the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, Department of Finance and Administration, with its duties of preplanning, construction, repair and renovation for buildings of all state agencies, institutions and departments.

The committee shall be composed of the following eight (8) members:

The Chairman and Vice-Chairman of the Senate Public Property Committee;

The Chairman and Vice-Chairman of the House Public Building, Grounds and Lands Committee;

Two (2) Senators appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; and

Two (2) Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

The committee shall advise the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management with its duties of preplanning, construction, repair and renovation for buildings of all state agencies, institutions and departments, including but not limited to the following:

Traveling with the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management to inspect and consider requests for improvement and repair of buildings of state agencies, institutions and departments;

Acquiring a working knowledge of state building matters in order to become leaders in facility related legislation; and

Advising and making recommendations to the Legislature on matters relating to preplanning, construction, repair and renovation for all state buildings.

The members of the committee shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management.

No committee member may receive per diem, travel or other expenses unless authorized by the Management Committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives. Members of the committee shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of the Senate and the House of Representatives in the same amounts as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem or expense for attending meetings of the committee will be paid while the Legislature is in session.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 533, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1996).

§ 31-11-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1983; and by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§31-11-5. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-03; Laws, 1944, ch. 328, § 5]

§ 31-11-7.
Reports.

The office of general services shall submit a full report of its work and all transactions carried on by it and a complete statement of all expenditures made by it, to each regular session of the legislature or to a special session before that time if its work has been completed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9023-04; Laws, 1944, ch. 328, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 31-11-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§31-11-9. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-05; Laws, 1944, ch. 328, § 7; Laws, 1950, ch. 467; Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 11]

§§ 31-11-11 through 31-11-23.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§§31-11-11 through31-11-19. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-11; Laws, 1946, ch. 446, §§ 1-9]

§§31-11-21 through31-11-23. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-51; Laws, 1960, ch. 383, §§ 1-4]

§ 31-11-25.
Right of eminent domain.

The office of general services with the approval of the public procurement review board shall have the power and authority to acquire in its own name, or in the name of such other agency or instrumentality in the State of Mississippi as it may deem proper, by purchase, contribution or otherwise, all land and real property which shall be necessary and desirable in connection with the development or expansion of any state institution or public agency of this state upon any real property adjacent to or contiguous to such institution or agency or in connection with any project under the supervision of said office of general services for the construction, repair, remodeling, renovating, or making additions to any building structure or other facility which the office of general services is required or authorized by law to construct, repair, remodel, or make an addition to. If the office of general services shall be unable to agree with the owner or owners of any such land or real property which is necessary or desirable for the public use in connection with any such project, the office of general services shall have the power and authority to acquire any such land or real property by condemnation proceedings in the manner otherwise provided by law and, for such purpose, the right of eminent domain is hereby conferred upon and vested in said office of general services.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9023-52; Laws, 1960, ch. 382.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 604; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 31-11-27.
Study of capital needs; annual reports.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall conduct a detailed study of the building and other capital needs at each state institution and at each community college and junior college immediately prior to September first in each year. This study shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following matters:

An inventory of every state building and other capital facility which is the property of the State of Mississippi;

The location, date of construction or acquisition, the purpose for which used, outstanding indebtedness against such facility, if any, and cost of repairs for the preceding fiscal year;

An examination of the condition of the building or other facility, including current conditions and ratings of all roofs at each state agency, state institution of higher learning, community college and junior college;

An estimate of the cost of repairs required to place the facility in good condition;

An estimate of the cost of major renovations, if contemplated; and

A determination of the new building and other facility needs of each institution with such needs classified under immediate or long range requirements.

All state agencies, departments and institutions are hereby required and directed to cooperate with the Department of Finance and Administration in carrying out the provisions of this section. For purposes of validating subsection (1)(a)(iii) above, each roof of a building not planned for demolition must be visually inspected by institution or agency facilities’ staff, by a licensed architect or engineer or by thermal imaging inspection at least every three (3) years.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall submit a detailed report to the Legislative Budget Office, the House Public Property Committee and the Senate Public Property Committee on or before September first of each year. Such report shall be in such detail and in such form as may be prescribed by the Legislative Budget Office.

The architect or building inspector of the Department of Finance and Administration shall make a biennial inspection of the New Capitol, Old Capitol, Woolfolk State Office Building, War Memorial Building, the Governor’s Mansion, and all other buildings under jurisdiction of the Department of Finance and Administration for structural or other physical needs or defects of such buildings, and he shall further inquire of the department or its representatives regarding the condition of the buildings. He shall make a written report of his finding to the Department of Finance and Administration, Governor, Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House of Representatives. The report shall also make recommendations for repairs and list, by number, the priority which should be given to making necessary repairs.

In addition to any report required in subsection (1) of this section, the Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare and submit an annual report to the Legislative Budget Office, the House Public Property Committee and the Senate Public Property Committee describing the proposed capital improvements projects for state agencies, departments and institutions for the upcoming five-year period. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not be required to include in the report any project costing less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). The department shall submit the report before September 1 of each year. The report shall include at least the following information:

A prioritized list of the projects proposed for the five-year period, with each project ranked on the basis of need, consistent with the primary goal of preserving existing capital assets where possible and replacing existing capital assets where necessary;

A prioritized list of the projects proposed for the next regular legislative session, with each project ranked on the basis of need, consistent with the primary goal of preserving existing capital assets where possible and replacing existing capital assets where necessary;

A prioritized list of the projects requested by each state agency, department or institution;

A detailed explanation of criteria used by the Department of Finance and Administration to rank projects for purposes of any list it prepares under this paragraph (a);

A detailed statement of justification for each project;

The approximate cost for each project, including, but not limited to, itemized estimates of costs for preplanning, constructing, furnishing and equipping a project, and costs for property acquisition;

The estimated beginning date and completion date for each project;

Whether a project, as proposed, is a complete project or a phase or part of a project;

How a project will affect the operating budget of the applicable agency, department or institution for the upcoming five-year period, regarding such items as additional personnel requirements, utility costs, maintenance costs, security costs, etc. Any request for new construction other than replacement, or for purposes other than incidental expansion of existing facilities, shall also identify the total amount of nonstate funds to support such project;

The proposed method of financing each project and the effect such financing will have on the state budget, including an estimate of any required debt service for the project, and an estimate of any federal funds or other funds that the agency, department or institution may have access to because of the project; and

A list of the projects requested by each agency, department or institution for the five-year period, with each project ranked by the appropriate agency, department or institution on the basis of need.

To enable the Department of Finance and Administration to prepare the report required in this subsection (2), it may require all state agencies, departments and institutions to file a capital improvements projects request with such information and in such form and in such detail as the department may deem necessary and advisable. Such request shall be filed with the Department of Finance and Administration no later than August 1 of each year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9023-54; Laws, 1962, ch. 608, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1964, ch. 572, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 34; Laws, 1994, ch. 439, § 1, eff from and July 1, 1994; Laws, 2000, ch. 531, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000); Laws, 2018, ch. 450, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 31-11-29.
Capital expense and development budget.

The legislative budget office shall prepare and submit to each regular session of the legislature a “capital expense and development” budget based on information furnished as herein provided by the office of general services, plus such other information as may be obtained. The said budget shall contain an estimate of the immediate and the long term capital needs of each state department, agency, institution, and each junior college. Such budget shall include a description of the buildings and other facilities which are recommended as needed at each institution, along with an estimate of the cost. The budget shall also include a suggested method of financing the immediate needs. “Immediate needs” shall be construed to mean: buildings, major improvements, and other facilities required for the proper functioning of the institution for the next year. “Long range” needs shall be construed to mean: buildings, major improvements, and other facilities of a similar nature which may be required at some indefinite date in the future.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9023-55; Laws, 1962, ch. 608, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 31-11-30.
Capital improvements costing $2 million or more to be funded in two phases; each phase to be funded in separate legislative sessions; phase 1 to be preplanned capital improvements project budget projection; phase 2 to be actual repair, renovation, construction, remodeling, etc.; exemptions.

Every capital improvements project for new facilities, costing Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) or more, which is developed to repair, renovate, construct, remodel, add to or improve a state-owned public building shall be funded by the Legislature in two (2) phases. The two-phase funding requirement shall not apply to capital improvements projects for a state-owned port or where the Legislature finds that an emergency or critical need must be met or a court order complied with. The two (2) phases shall not be funded in the same regular session of the Legislature. Each phase shall be funded in a separate session of the Legislature. Phase 1 shall be a preplanned capital improvements project budget projection for the project and shall be funded first. Phase 2 shall be the actual repair, renovation, construction, remodeling, addition to or improvement of the state-owned public building and the acquisition of furniture and equipment for the capital improvements project and shall be funded second.

For the purposes of this section:

“Preplanned” or “preplanning” means the preliminary planning that establishes the program, scope, design and budget for a capital improvements project.

“Emergency” has the meaning as defined in Section 31-7-1.

“Critical need” means necessary to meet accreditation standards or necessary to respond to failures in planning.

Every state agency that plans to repair, renovate, construct, remodel, add to or improve a state-owned public building shall submit a preplanned capital improvements project budget projection to the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management for evaluation. The bureau shall assess the need for all preplanned projects submitted and shall compile a report on its findings. Any capital improvements project for new facilities costing less than Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) shall not be required to be preplanned.

Upon the completion of any preplanning for a capital improvements project, if such preplanning is funded with self-generated funds by a state agency, the plan shall be submitted to the bureau for evaluation.

This section shall not apply to capital improvements projects authorized by the Legislature before the 2001 Regular Session of the Legislature.

This section shall not apply to any community or junior college project funded in whole or in part by either state bonds or funds appropriated for that construction by the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 531, § 6; Laws, 2007, ch. 527, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 31-11-31.
Commission designated to act for state in matters relating to Federal Higher Education Facilities Act of 1963.

The office of general services of the State of Mississippi is hereby authorized and empowered to act as the commission designated to perform all functions on behalf of the State of Mississippi as provided for and required in Public Law No. 88-204 of the 88th Congress of the United States of America and being entitled “Higher Education Facilities Act of 1963” as thereafter amended, and the said office of general services is hereby granted such power and authority necessary for the purpose of performing for and on behalf of the State of Mississippi all things required to be done and performed by the office of general services as specified in said Public Law No. 88-204 of the 88th Congress of the United States government, as thereafter amended.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9023-56; Laws, 1964, ch. 413; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 31-11-33.
Construction of new public facility to comply with certain building code standards; definitions; specifications; regulation of certain building features.

For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meanings hereinafter ascribed:

“Department” means the Department of Finance and Administration, Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management.

“Public facility” means any building or other facility owned by the State of Mississippi, or by any agency, department of the State of Mississippi, that is occupied, used or under the control of the State of Mississippi, or any agency or department of the State of Mississippi, or any junior college district of the State of Mississippi, or the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning of the State of Mississippi, or any institution under the jurisdiction of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning of the State of Mississippi.

Any public facility newly constructed from and after July 1, 2006, shall comply with and be built according to specifications not less stringent than those required by the International Code Council and such other standards as adopted by the department that provide guidelines for plumbing, electrical, gas, sanitary and other physical components of new building construction.

Upon the awarding of a design contract for a new public facility, the architect/engineer shall prepare drawings and specifications in conformity with the code requirements in effect at the time of agreement or, if the code requirements at the time of the agreement are amended, then the drawings and specifications shall be prepared according to the more stringent standards.

The department may regulate the height, number of stories and size of public facilities, the percentage of the lot that may be occupied, courts and other open spaces, and the location and use of public facilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 579, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 31-11-35.
Adoption of rules and regulations regarding energy performance of state-funded buildings; design and construction of major facility projects to meet or exceed certain energy requirements.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall adopt rules and regulations which:

Optimize the energy performance of state-funded buildings throughout the state;

Increase the demand for building and construction materials, finishes, furnishings and other products made in or incorporating materials produced in Mississippi;

Improve environmental quality in this state by decreasing the discharge of pollutants from state-funded buildings;

Conserve energy and utilize local and renewable energy sources;

Protect and restore this state’s natural resources by avoiding development of inappropriate state-funded building sites;

Reduce the burden on public water supply and treatment by reducing potable water consumption; and

Encourage obtaining ENERGY STAR designation from the United States Environmental Protection Agency to further demonstrate a building project’s energy independence.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 39-25-1, each major facility project shall be designed and constructed to meet or exceed the requirements of ASHRAE 90.1-2010 or any more stringent code adopted by the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management and the Department of Finance and Administration.

In order to achieve sustainable building standards, construction projects may utilize a nationally recognized high performance environmental building rating system; provided, however, that any such rating system that uses a material or product-based credit system which is disadvantageous to materials or products manufactured or produced in Mississippi shall not be utilized. Additionally, such rating systems shall not exclude certificate credits for forest products certified by the Sustainable Forestry Initiative, Forest Stewardship Council or the American Tree Farm System. The Department of Finance and Administration shall designate rating systems which meet these criteria and may establish its own rating system.

A nationally certified commissioning authority professional shall certify that the major facility project’s systems for heating, ventilation, air-conditioning, energy conservation and water conservation are installed and working properly to ensure that each major facility project performs according to the major facility project’s overall environmental design intent and operational objectives.

For purposes of this section, a major facility project shall mean either:

A state-funded new construction building project which is:

From July 1 through December 31, 2009, the project shall be larger than twenty thousand (20,000) gross square feet;

From January 1, 2010, through December 31, 2010, the project shall be larger than fifteen thousand (15,000) gross square feet;

From January 1, 2011, through December 31, 2011, the project shall be larger than ten thousand (10,000) gross square feet; and

From January 1, 2012, and thereafter, the project shall be larger than five thousand (5,000) gross square feet.

A state-funded renovation project which involves more than fifty percent (50%) of the replacement value of the facility where compliance is cost-effective and practical.

A major facility project shall not mean a building, regardless of size, which does not have conditioned space as defined by Standard 90.1 of the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating, and Air-Conditioning Engineers.

For purposes of this section, a “major facility project” shall include, but not be limited to, the construction or renovation of buildings that are financed, in whole or in part, through the use of a Community Development Block Grant.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 327, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 401, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 539, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 361, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2017).